Alaska statutes. Title 36. Public Contracts.
Article 8. Legal and Contractual Remedies.

Administrative Code. —

For legal and contractual remedies, see 2 AAC 12, art. 13.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Where there is an impermissible taint of favoritism suggested by facts or invited by improper procurement practices, public contracts can and should be declared void even absent actual proof that favoritism in fact occurred. 1985 Op. Att'y Gen. 3.

Sec. 36.30.550.
Applicability of protest and appeal procedures.

Except for small procurements made under AS

36.30.320

, the provisions of AS

36.30.560

—

36.30.615

apply to a solicitation, a proposed contract award, and an award of a contract for supplies, services, professional services, or construction.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations providing for protest and appeal procedures of small procurements made under AS

36.30.320

.

History.

(§ 32 ch 137 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For legal and contractual remedies, see 2 AAC 12, art. 13.

Sec. 36.30.560.
Filing of a protest.

An interested party may protest the award of a contract, the proposed award of a contract, or a solicitation for supplies, services, professional services, or construction by an agency. The protest shall be filed with the procurement officer of the contracting agency in writing and include the following information:

the name, address, and telephone number of the protester;

the signature of the protester or the protester’s representative;

identification of the contracting agency and the solicitation or contract at issue;

a detailed statement of the legal and factual grounds of the protest, including copies of relevant documents; and

the form of relief requested.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 36.30.565.
Time for filing a protest.

A protest based on alleged improprieties or ambiguities in a solicitation must be filed at least 10 days before the due date of the bid or proposal, unless a later protest due date is specifically allowed in the solicitation. If a solicitation is made with a shortened public notice period and the protest is based on alleged improprieties or ambiguities in the solicitation, the protest must be filed before the due date of the bid or proposal. Notwithstanding the other provisions in this subsection, the protest of an invitation to bid or a request for proposals in which a pre-bid or pre-proposal conference is held within 12 days of the due date must be filed before the due date of the bid or proposal if the protest is based on alleged improprieties or ambiguities in the solicitation. A protest based upon alleged improprieties in an award of a contract or a proposed award of a contract must be filed within 10 days after a notice of intent to award the contract is issued by the procurement officer.

If the protester shows good cause, the procurement officer of the contracting agency may consider a filed protest that is not timely.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 19 ch 65 SLA 1987; am § 33 ch 137 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For competitive sealed bidding; multistep bidding, see 2 AAC 12, art. 3.

Sec. 36.30.570.
Notice of a protest.

The procurement officer shall immediately give notice of a protest filed under AS

36.30.565

to the contractor if a contract has been awarded or, if no award has been made, to all interested parties.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 36.30.575.
Stay of award.

If a protest is filed the award may be made unless the procurement officer of the contracting agency determines in writing that a

reasonable probability exists that the protest will be sustained; or

stay of the award is not contrary to the best interests of the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 36.30.580.
Decision by the procurement officer.

The procurement officer of the contracting agency shall issue a written decision containing the basis of the decision within 15 days after a protest has been filed. A copy of the decision shall be furnished to the protester by certified mail or other method that provides evidence of receipt.

The time for a decision may be extended up to 30 days for good cause by the commissioner of administration, or, for protests involving construction or procurements for the state equipment fleet, the commissioner of transportation and public facilities. If an extension is granted, the procurement officer shall notify the protester in writing of the date that the decision is due.

If a decision is not made by the date it is due, the protester may proceed as if the procurement officer had issued a decision adverse to the protester.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am §§ 34, 35 ch 137 SLA 1996)

Sec. 36.30.585.
Protest remedies.

If the procurement officer sustains a protest in whole or in part, the procurement officer shall implement an appropriate remedy.

In determining an appropriate remedy, the procurement officer shall consider the circumstances surrounding the solicitation or procurement including the seriousness of the procurement deficiencies, the degree of prejudice to other interested parties or to the integrity of the procurement system, the good faith of the parties, the extent the procurement has been accomplished, costs to the agency and other impacts on the agency of a proposed remedy, and the urgency of the procurement to the welfare of the state.

Notwithstanding (a) and (b) of this section, if a protest is sustained in whole or part, the protester’s damages are limited to reasonable bid or proposal preparation costs.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 36 ch 137 SLA 1996)

Sec. 36.30.590.
Appeal on a protest.

An appeal from a decision of a procurement officer on a protest may be filed by the protester with the commissioner of administration, or for protests involving construction or procurements for the state equipment fleet, the commissioner of transportation and public facilities. An appeal shall be filed within 10 days after the decision is received by the protester. The protester shall file a copy of the appeal with the procurement officer.

An appeal must contain the information required under AS

36.30.560

. In addition, the appeal must include

a copy of the decision being appealed; and

identification of the factual or legal errors in the decision that form the basis for the appeal.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 16 ch 102 SLA 1989)

Sec. 36.30.595.
Notice and copy of a protest appeal.

The procurement officer shall immediately give notice of an appeal filed under AS

36.30.590

to the contractor if a contract has been awarded or, if no award has been made, to all interested parties.

The commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities, as appropriate, shall, on request, furnish a copy of the appeal to a person notified under (a) of this section, except that confidential material shall be deleted from the copy.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 36.30.600.
Stay of award during protest appeal.

If a protest appeal is filed before a contract is awarded and the award was stayed under AS

36.30.575

, the filing of the appeal automatically continues the stay until the commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities, as appropriate, makes a written determination that the award of the contract without further delay is necessary to protect substantial interests of the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 36.30.605.
Protest report and comments.

The procurement officer of the contracting agency shall file a complete report on the protest and decision with the commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities, as appropriate, within 10 days after a protest appeal is filed. The procurement officer shall furnish a copy of the report to the protester and to interested parties that have requested a copy of the appeal under AS

36.30.595(b)

.

The procurement officer may request an extension of time to prepare the protest report. The request must be in writing listing the reasons for the request. The commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities, as appropriate, shall respond to the request in writing. If an extension is granted, the commissioner shall list the reasons for granting the extension and indicate the date the protest report is due. The commissioner shall notify the protester in writing that the time for submission of the report has been extended and the date the report is due.

The protester may file comments on the protest report with the commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities, as appropriate, within 10 days after the report is received. The protester shall provide copies of the comments to the procurement officer and to interested parties that have requested a copy of the appeal under AS

36.30.595(b)

.

The protester may request an extension of time to prepare the comments on the protest report. The request must be in writing listing the reasons for the request. The commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities, as appropriate, shall respond to the request in writing. If an extension is granted, the commissioner shall list the reasons for granting the extension and indicate the date the comments are due. The commissioner shall notify the procurement officer in writing that the time for submission of the comments has been extended and the date the comments are due.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am §§ 37, 38 ch 137 SLA 1996)

Sec. 36.30.610.
Decision without hearing.

The commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities, as appropriate, shall dismiss a protest appeal before a hearing is held if it is determined in writing that the appeal is untimely under AS

36.30.590(a)

.

The commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities, as appropriate, may issue a decision on an appeal without a hearing if the appeal involves questions of law without genuine issues of fact.

The commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities, as appropriate, shall, within 15 days from the date the appellant’s comments on the protest report are due under AS

36.30.605(c)

and (d), notify the appellant of the acceptance or rejection of the appeal and, if rejected, the reasons for the rejection.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 20 ch 65 SLA 1987; am § 9 ch 37 SLA 1993)

Sec. 36.30.615.
Hearing on protest appeal.

A hearing on a protest appeal shall be conducted in accordance with AS

36.30.670

and regulations adopted by the commissioner to the extent the regulations do not conflict with regulations adopted under AS

44.64.060

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 52 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Sec. 36.30.620.
Contract claims.

A contractor shall file a claim concerning a contract awarded under this chapter with the procurement officer. The contractor shall certify that the claim is made in good faith, that the supporting data are accurate and complete to the best of the contractor’s knowledge and belief, and that the amount requested accurately reflects the contract adjustment for which the contractor believes the state is liable. Except for a lease rate adjustment called for in the lease, a claim under this section must be filed within 90 days after the contractor becomes aware of the basis of the claim or should have known the basis of the claim, whichever is earlier. A lease rate adjustment called for in the lease must be filed prior to the expiration date of the lease.

If a claim asserted concerning a contract awarded under this chapter cannot be resolved by agreement, the procurement officer shall, after receiving a written request by the contractor for a decision, issue a written decision. The procurement officer shall make the decision not more than 90 days after receipt of all necessary information from the contractor. If the contractor fails to furnish necessary information requested by the procurement officer, the procurement officer shall proceed to decide the claim and may, in the procurement officer’s discretion, deny all or part of the claim because of the failure to furnish necessary information. During an appeal under this chapter, the contractor may not rely on or introduce information that the contractor has failed to furnish to the procurement officer in support of the claim. Before issuing the decision, the procurement officer shall review the facts relating to the claim and obtain necessary assistance from legal, fiscal, and other advisors.

Upon the written request of the procurement officer, the time for issuing a decision under (b) of this section may be extended for up to 60 additional days by the commissioner if the claim concerns an amount in excess of $50,000. Upon the written request of the procurement officer showing that good cause exists for a second extension, the commissioner may extend the time for issuing a decision under (b) of this section up to 90 additional days after the first extension. The contractor shall be provided with an opportunity to oppose or otherwise respond to the request for a second extension. If a second extension is granted, the commissioner shall notify the contractor and the procurement officer in writing that the time for the issuance of a decision has been extended and of the date by which a decision shall be issued. In this subsection, “commissioner” means the commissioner of administration or, for a claim involving a construction contract or procurement for the state equipment fleet, the commissioner of transportation and public facilities.

The procurement officer shall furnish a copy of the decision to the contractor by certified mail or other method that provides evidence of receipt. The decision must include

a description of the claim;

a reference to the pertinent contract provisions;

a statement of the agreed upon and disputed facts;

findings of fact about the claim;

a determination of any amount payable;

a statement of reasons supporting the decision; and

a statement substantially as follows:

If the procurement officer does not issue a written decision by the date it is due, the contractor may proceed as if the procurement officer had issued a decision adverse to the contractor.

If a claim asserted by the state concerning a contract awarded under this chapter cannot be resolved by agreement the matter shall be immediately referred to the commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities, as appropriate.

This section does not apply to payment disputes governed by AS

37.05.285

.

“This is the final decision of the procurement officer. This decision may be appealed to the commissioner of (administration/transportation and public facilities). If you appeal, you must file a written notice of appeal with the commissioner within 14 days after you receive this decision.”

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am §§ 39, 40 ch 137 SLA 1996; am §§ 2 — 5 ch 144 SLA 2003)

Sec. 36.30.623.
Interest on certain claims.

The amount ultimately determined to be due under AS

36.30.620

—

36.30.630

and

36.30.670

—

36.30.685

to a department contractor, the department, or a contracting agency to whom the responsibility for handling the claims is delegated by the department under AS

36.30.632

accrues interest at the rate applicable to judgments under AS

09.30.070(a)

. Notwithstanding AS

09.30.070(b)

, the interest accrues from the date that a complete claim is filed that meets the requirements of AS

36.30.620

(a) through the date of a decision by the procurement officer under AS 36.30.620, a decision by the commissioner of transportation and public facilities under AS

36.30.680

, or a judicial decision under AS

36.30.685

, whichever decision is latest. In this section, “department” means the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2003, in accordance with sec. 18, ch. 144, SLA 2003, “claim” was substituted for “controversy” in this section.

Sec. 36.30.625.
Appeal on a contract claim.

An appeal from a decision of the procurement officer on a contract claim may be filed by the contractor with the commissioner of administration or, for a claim involving a construction contract or procurement for the state equipment fleet, the commissioner of transportation and public facilities. The appeal shall be filed within 14 days after the decision is received by the contractor. An appeal by a contractor of the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities may not raise any new factual issues or theories of recovery that were not presented to and decided by the procurement officer in the decision under AS

36.30.620(b)

, except that a contractor may increase the contractor’s calculation of damages if the increase arises out of the same operative facts on which the original claim was based. The contractor shall file a copy of the appeal with the procurement officer.

An appeal must contain a copy of the decision being appealed and identification of the factual or legal errors in the decision that form the basis for the appeal.

The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, or a contracting agency to whom the responsibility for handling the claim is delegated by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities under AS

36.30.632

, shall handle the appeal of a claim under this section expeditiously.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am §§ 2, 3 ch 98 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2003, in accordance with sec. 18, ch. 144, SLA 2003, “claim” was substituted for “controversy” in this section.

Sec. 36.30.627.
Construction contract claim appeals.

An appeal from a decision of the procurement officer of a claim involving a construction contract shall be resolved by

binding and final arbitration under AS

09.43.010

—

09.43.180

(Uniform Arbitration Act) or AS

09.43.300

—

09.43.595

(Revised Uniform Arbitration Act), as applicable, if the claim is

less than $250,000 and the contractor requests arbitration of the claim; or

$250,000 or more and both the agency and the contractor agree to arbitration of the claim; or

a hearing under AS

36.30.630

if the claim is not handled by arbitration under (1) of this subsection.

In this section, a claim includes all issues, causes of action, and controversies arising from a construction contract for which a contractor or the contracting agency asserts compensation is due.

History.

(§ 6 ch 144 SLA 2003; am § 36 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Administrative Code. —

For construction arbitration procedures, see 2 AAC 12, art. 17.

Quoted

in

Dep't of Transp. & Pub. Facilities v. Osborne Constr. Co., 462 P.3d 991 (Alaska 2020).

Sec. 36.30.629.
Subpoenas and discovery.

In appeals under AS

36.30.627

, the arbitrator or hearing officer may

issue subpoenas, including subpoenas duces tecum, to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents;

allow the taking of depositions for discovery or to perpetuate testimony; and

refer a subpoena or subpoena duces tecum to the superior court for enforcement and the imposition of appropriate sanctions.

History.

(§ 6 ch 144 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For construction arbitration procedures, see 2 AAC 12, art. 17.

Sec. 36.30.630.
Hearing on a contract claim; decision without hearing.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a hearing shall be conducted according to AS

36.30.670

and, to the extent they do not conflict with regulations adopted under AS

44.64.060

, regulations adopted by the commissioner of administration on a contract claim appealed to the commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities or referred to either commissioner under AS

36.30.620(f)

.

Except as provided in AS

36.30.627(a)(1)

, within 15 days after receipt of an appeal on a contract claim, the commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities, as appropriate, may adopt the decision of the procurement officer as the final decision without a hearing.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 7 ch 144 SLA 2003; am § 53 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Sec. 36.30.631.
Attorney fees, costs, and offers of judgment.

An arbitrator in the arbitration of a construction contract claim under AS

36.30.627(a)(1)

and a hearing officer for the hearing of a construction contract claim conducted under AS

36.30.627(a)(2)

shall award the prevailing party attorney fees and costs incurred in the arbitration or hearing. The award shall be made as provided by Rules 68, 79, and 82 of the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure.

Either party to an arbitration of a construction contract claim conducted under AS

36.30.627

or a hearing of a construction contract claim conducted under AS

36.30.630(a)

may serve on the adverse party an offer to allow a final decision to be entered in complete satisfaction of the claim. The offer shall be made, accepted, or rejected as provided for an offer of judgment under Rule 68 of the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure. Acceptance or rejection of the offer has the same consequences as acceptance or rejection of an offer of judgment made in a civil action under Rule 68 of the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

(§ 8 ch 144 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For construction arbitration procedures, see 2 AAC 12, art. 17.

Sec. 36.30.632.
Delegation.

The commissioner of administration and the commissioner of transportation and public facilities may delegate responsibilities under AS

36.30.590

—

36.30.630

to the head of the contracting agency.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 9 ch 144 SLA 2003)

Sec. 36.30.635.
Authority to debar or suspend.

After consultation with the using agency and the attorney general and after a hearing conducted according to AS

36.30.670

and, to the extent they do not conflict with regulations adopted under AS

44.64.060

, regulations adopted by the commissioner of administration, the commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities may debar a person for cause from consideration for award of contracts. Notice of a debarment hearing shall be provided in writing at least seven days before the hearing. The debarment may not be for a period of more than three years.

The commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities, after consultation with the using agency and the attorney general, may suspend a person from consideration for award of contracts if there is probable cause for debarment and compelling reasons require suspension to protect state interests. The suspension may not be for a period exceeding three months.

The authority to debar or suspend shall be exercised in accordance with regulations adopted by the commissioner of administration.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 54 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For legal and contractual remedies, see 2 AAC 12, art. 13.

Sec. 36.30.640.
Causes for debarment or suspension.

The causes for debarment or suspension include

conviction for commission of a criminal offense as an incident to obtaining or attempting to obtain a public or private contract or subcontract, or in the performance of the contract or subcontract;

conviction under state or federal statutes of embezzlement, theft, forgery, bribery, falsification or destruction of records, receiving stolen property, or other offense indicating a lack of business integrity or business honesty that currently and seriously affects responsibility as a state contractor;

conviction or civil judgment finding a violation under state or federal antitrust statutes;

violation of contract provisions of a character that is regarded by the commissioner to be so serious as to justify debarment action, such as

knowing failure without good cause to perform in accordance with the specifications or within the time limit provided in the contract; or

failure to perform or unsatisfactory performance in accordance with the terms of one or more contracts, except that failure to perform or unsatisfactory performance caused by acts beyond the control of the contractor may not be considered to be a basis for debarment;

for violation of the ethical standards set out in law or regulation;

for a violation of this chapter punishable under AS

36.30.930

(2); and

any other cause listed in regulations of the commissioner determined to be so serious and compelling as to affect responsibility as a state contractor, including debarment by another governmental entity for a cause listed in the regulations.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 36.30.645.
Written determinations.

The commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities shall issue a written decision to debar or suspend. The decision must

state the reasons for the action taken; and

inform the debarred person of rights to judicial appeal or inform the suspended person of rights to administrative and judicial appeal.

A copy of the decision under (a) of this section shall be mailed or otherwise furnished immediately to the debarred or suspended person and any other intervening party.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 36.30.650.
Hearing on a suspension.

A person suspended under AS

36.30.635

is entitled to a hearing conducted according to AS

36.30.670

and, to the extent that they do not conflict with regulations adopted under AS

44.64.060

, regulations adopted by the commissioner of administration, if the person files a written request for a hearing with the commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities, as appropriate, within seven days after receipt of the notice of suspension under AS

36.30.645

.

If a suspended person requests a hearing, the commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities, as appropriate, after consulting with the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

), shall schedule a prompt hearing unless the attorney general determines that a hearing at the proposed time is likely to jeopardize an investigation. A hearing may not be delayed longer than six months after notice of the suspension is provided under AS

36.30.645

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 55 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Sec. 36.30.655.
List of persons debarred or suspended.

The commissioner shall maintain a list of all persons debarred or suspended from consideration for the award of contracts.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 41 ch 137 SLA 1996; am § 22 ch 59 SLA 2013)

Sec. 36.30.660.
Reinstatement.

The commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities may at any time after a final decision to debar a person from consideration for award of contracts reinstate the person after determining that the cause for which the person was debarred no longer exists or has been substantially mitigated.

A debarred person may request reinstatement by submitting a petition to the commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities supported by evidence showing that the cause for debarment no longer exists or has been substantially mitigated.

The commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities may require a hearing on a reinstatement petition. A decision on reinstatement shall be made in writing within seven days after a reinstatement petition is submitted. The decision must specify the factors on which it is based. A decision under this section is not subject to judicial appeal.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 36.30.665.
Limited participation by debarred person.

The commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities may permit a debarred person to participate in a contract on a limited basis during the debarment period if the commissioner determines in writing that the participation is advantageous to the state.
The determination shall specify the factors on which it is based and the limits imposed on the debarred person.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 36.30.670.
Hearing procedures.

The chief administrative law judge (AS

44.64.010

) shall assign an administrative law judge to act as a hearing officer for a hearing conducted under this chapter. The hearing officer shall arrange for a prompt hearing and notify the parties in writing of the time and place of the hearing. The hearing shall be conducted in an informal manner. The provisions of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) do not apply to a hearing conducted under this chapter.

The hearing officer may

hold prehearing conferences to settle, simplify, or identify the issues in a proceeding, or to consider other matters that may aid in the expeditious disposition of the proceeding;

require parties to state their positions concerning the various issues in the proceeding;

require parties to produce for examination those relevant witnesses and documents under their control;

rule on motions and other procedural matters;

regulate the course of the hearing and conduct of the participants;

establish time limits for submission of motions or memoranda;

impose appropriate sanctions against a person who fails to obey an order of the hearing officer, including

prohibiting the person from asserting or opposing designated claims or defenses or introducing designated matters into evidence;

excluding all testimony of an unresponsive or evasive witness; and

excluding a person from further participation in the hearing;

take official notice of a material fact not appearing in evidence, if the fact is among the traditional matters subject to judicial notice;

administer oaths or affirmations.

A transcribed record of the hearing shall be made available at cost to a party that requests it.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 56 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For legal and contractual remedies, see 2 AAC 12, art. 13.

Sec. 36.30.675.
Recommended decision and commissioner action.

The hearing officer shall recommend a decision to the commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities, as appropriate, based on the evidence presented. The recommendation must include findings of fact and conclusions of law.

The commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities may affirm, modify, or reject the hearing officer’s recommendation in whole or in part, may remand the matter to the hearing officer with instructions, or take other appropriate action.

Sec. 36.30.680.
Final decision by the commissioner.

A decision by the commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities after a hearing under this chapter is final. A decision shall be sent within 20 days after the hearing to all parties by personal service or certified mail, except that a decision by the commissioner of transportation and public facilities involving procurement of construction shall be sent to all parties by personal service or certified mail within 45 days after receipt by the commissioner of transportation and public facilities of the hearing officer’s decision.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 10 ch 144 SLA 2003)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 16, ch. 144, SLA 2003 provides that the amendments made to this section by
ch. 144, SLA 2003 “apply to a contract if the contract is entered into on or after October 14, 2003.”

Sec. 36.30.685.
Judicial appeal.

A final decision of the commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities under AS

36.30.610

,

36.30.635(a)

,

36.30.650

, or

36.30.680

may be appealed to the superior court in accordance with the Alaska Rules of Appellate Procedure.

A final decision of the commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities under AS

36.30.630(b)

may be appealed to the superior court for a trial de novo.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 36.30.687.
Misrepresentations, fraud, and attempted fraud.

A person who makes or uses in support of a contract claim under this chapter, a misrepresentation, or who practices or attempts to practice a fraud, at any stage of proceedings relating to a procurement or contract claim under this chapter

forfeits all claims relating to that procurement or contract; and

is liable to the state for reimbursement of all sums paid on the claim, for all costs attributable to review of the claim, and for a civil penalty equal to the amount by which the claim is misrepresented.

The procurement officer, commissioner or court shall make specific findings of misrepresentation, attempted fraud, or fraud before declaring a forfeiture under (a)(1) of this section.

Suits to recover costs and penalties under (a)(2) of this section must be commenced within six years after the discovery of the misrepresentation, fraud, or attempted fraud.

A person who in a matter relating to a procurement or a contract claim under this chapter makes a misrepresentation to the state through a trick, scheme, or device is guilty of a class C felony.

In this section, “misrepresentation” means a false or misleading statement of material fact, or conduct intended to deceive or mislead concerning material fact, whether it succeeds in deceiving or misleading.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 11 ch 144 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For legal and contractual remedies, see 2 AAC 12, art. 13.

Editor’s notes. —

In 2003, in accordance with sec. 18, ch. 144, SLA 2003, “claim” was substituted for “controversy” in this section.

Sec. 36.30.690.
Exclusive remedy.

Notwithstanding AS 44.77 or other law to the contrary, AS

36.30.560

—

36.30.699

and regulations adopted under those sections provide the exclusive procedure for asserting a claim against an agency arising in relation to a procurement under this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For construction arbitration procedures, see 2 AAC 12, art. 17.

Sec. 36.30.695.
Other rules of procedure.

The commissioner may adopt by regulation additional rules of procedure providing for the expeditious arbitration, hearing, and other administrative review of all contract claims, both before the contracting agency and through an appeal heard de novo.

Except as provided by (c) of this section, an arbitrator shall issue a final decision, and a hearing officer shall issue a recommended decision, within the following time limits after the date the record on the claim is closed:

30 calendar days for a claim of less than $100,000;

45 calendar days for a claim of $100,000 or more but less than $1,000,000; or

60 calendar days for a claim of $1,000,000 or more.

The commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities may, for good cause shown, grant an arbitrator or a hearing officer additional time to issue a decision.

If an arbitrator or hearing officer fails to issue a decision within the time allowed for a decision under (b) or (c) of this section, the arbitrator or hearing officer is disqualified from acting as an arbitrator or hearing officer in another proceeding under this chapter for one year after the decision is issued.

The venue for an arbitration or hearing under this chapter is the judicial district where the office of the contracting agency is located, unless the agency and the contractor agree on another location.

If a party fails to appear at a proceeding under this chapter, the arbitrator or hearing officer may proceed in the party’s absence.

Subject to appropriation, any money awarded by an arbitrator’s decision shall be paid within 45 days after the date that the arbitrator’s decision is final. Subject to appropriation, any money awarded by a hearing officer’s recommended decision that is approved by the commissioner of transportation and public facilities shall be paid within 45 days after the date that the commissioner’s decision is delivered to the contractor and the agency, unless the commissioner’s decision is appealed under AS

36.30.685

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am §§ 12, 13 ch 144 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For legal and contractual remedies, see 2 AAC 12, art. 13.

For construction arbitration procedures, see 2 AAC 12, art. 17.

Sec. 36.30.699.
Definition.

In AS

36.30.560

—

36.30.695

, “interested party” means an actual or prospective bidder or offeror whose economic interest may be affected substantially and directly by the issuance of a contract solicitation, the award of a contract, or the failure to award a contract; whether an actual or prospective bidder or offeror has an economic interest depends on the circumstances.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)